Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Article 2. Liability of Landowners to Trespassers

§ 34-19-201.
Definitions

As used in this article:

“Land” means land, including state land, roads, water, watercourses, private ways and buildings, structures, and machinery or equipment when attached to the realty;

“Owner” means the owner of an interest in land, a tenant, renter, lessee, including a lessee of state lands, lawful occupant or person in control of the premises;

“Trespasser” means a person or persons who enter or remain upon land in the possession of another without a privilege to do so created by the owner’s consent or otherwise.

History.

2015 ch. 145, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 106, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2015.

§ 34-19-202.
Duty of owner of land to trespasser.

Except as provided in W.S.

34-19-203

, an owner of land owes no duty of care to a trespasser and is not liable for any injury to a trespasser, except that the owner owes a duty not to willfully or wantonly injure a trespasser.

History.

2015 ch. 145, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 34-19-203.
Artificial conditions highly dangerous to trespassing children.

An owner of land is subject to liability for physical harm to a child trespassing on the land caused by an artificial condition upon the land if:

The place where the condition exists is one upon which the owner knows or has reason to know that a child is likely to trespass;

The condition is one of which the owner knows or has reason to know and which he realizes or should realize will involve an unreasonable risk of death or serious bodily harm to the child;

The child because of his youth does not discover the condition or realize the risk involved in intermeddling with it or in coming within the area made dangerous by it;

The utility to the owner of maintaining the condition and the burden of eliminating the danger are slight as compared with the risk to the child involved; and

The owner fails to exercise reasonable care to eliminate the danger or otherwise to protect the child.

History.

2015 ch. 145, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 34-19-204.
Conflicts.

If a statute other than a statute in this article prescribes a standard or duty of care that differs from that prescribed in this article, the other standard or duty of care shall control over the provisions of this article.

History.

2015 ch. 145, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.